Nevada, session 83, SB338.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 598 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. “Governmental charges” means any taxes, fees or
charges that the Federal Government or this State, or any agency
or political subdivision thereof, or a tribal government imposes on
or requires to be collected in connection with the sale of a ticket or
a transaction involving the sale of a ticket.
Sec. 3. “Ticket provider” means a natural person,
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, trust, unincorporated
organization or other enterprise that is engaged in the business of
selling tickets, reselling tickets or offering tickets for sale,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
including, without limitation, a primary ticket provider, reseller or
secondary ticket exchange.
Sec. 4. 1. A ticket provider shall not offer, display or
advertise any price of a ticket without clearly and conspicuously
disclosing the total price of the ticket. A ticket provider may
exclude from the total price:
(a) Governmental charges;
(b) Shipping charges; and
(c) Fees and charges for optional ancillary goods or services.
2. A ticket provider shall clearly and conspicuously disclose
to a consumer, before the consumer agrees to purchase a ticket:
(a) The nature, purpose and amount of any fee or charge that
has been excluded from the total price of the ticket and the identity
of the good or service for which the fee or charge is imposed; and
(b) The final amount of payment for the transaction.
3. A ticket provider shall display the total price of the ticket
more prominently than any other information relating to the price
of the ticket. Where the final amount of payment for the
transaction for the ticket is displayed, the final amount of payment
must be disclosed more prominently than, or as prominently as,
the total price.
4. For the purposes of subsections 1 and 2, a ticket provider
makes a clear and conspicuous disclosure if the disclosure is
easily noticeable and understandable by an ordinary consumer,
and:
(a) The disclosure uses clear and comprehensible language,
diction and syntax that is easily understandable to an ordinary
consumer or, if the communication containing the disclosure is
specifically targeted at a specific subset of consumers, including,
without limitation, children or seniors, the disclosure uses clear
and comprehensible language, diction and syntax that is easily
understandable to consumers in that subset of consumers.
(b) The disclosure is not contradicted or mitigated by, or
inconsistent with, anything else contained within the
communication containing the disclosure.
(c) The disclosure, if displayed visually, stands out from any
accompanying text or other visual elements by its size, contrast,
location, the length of time it appears and other characteristics, so
that it is easily noticed, read and understood.
(d) If the disclosure is made through audible means,
including, without limitation, by telephone or streaming video, the
disclosure is delivered in a volume, speed and cadence that would
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
allow an ordinary consumer to easily hear and understand the
disclosure.
(e) If the communication requiring the disclosure is displayed
using an interactive electronic medium, including, without
limitation, an Internet web browser or mobile application, the
disclosure is unavoidable.
(f) If the communication requiring the disclosure is made
through solely audible or solely visual means, the disclosure is
made through the same means as the whole communication.
(g) If the communication requiring the disclosure is made
through both visual and audible means, including, without
limitation, through a television advertisement, the communication
is presented simultaneously in both the visual and audible portion
of the communication, even if the representation requiring the
disclosure is made in only one means.
(h) The disclosure complies with all of the requirements of this
subsection in each medium through which it is received,
including, without limitation, all electronic devices and face-to-
face communications.
5. A ticket provider shall not misrepresent any fee or charge,
including, without limitation, misrepresenting:
(a) The nature, purpose or refundability of any fee or charge;
or
(b) The identity of any good or service for which the fee or
charge is imposed.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Ancillary good or service” means any additional good or
service offered to a consumer as part of a transaction for the
purchase of a ticket.
(b) “Shipping charges” means the fees or charges that
reasonably reflect the amount that a ticket provider incurs to
deliver or send a physical ticket to a consumer.
(c) “Total price” means the maximum total of all fees or
charges that a consumer must pay to complete a transaction to
purchase a ticket, including, without limitation, a fee or charge for
any mandatory ancillary good or service.
Sec. 5. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a
ticket provider that sells a ticket to a purchaser shall provide the
purchaser with a refund of the full amount that the purchaser
paid the ticket provider for the ticket, inclusive of all fees and
governmental charges, if the athletic contest or live entertainment
event to which the ticket pertains is cancelled. A ticket provider
must provide a refund required pursuant to this subsection not
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
more than 30 days after the rights holder or sponsor of the athletic
contest or live entertainment event, as applicable, notifies the
public that the athletic contest or live entertainment event to which
the ticket pertains is cancelled.
2. A ticket provider is not required to provide a refund
pursuant to subsection 1 if, in the discretion of the ticket provider:
(a) The athletic contest or live entertainment event for which
the ticket provider sold a ticket is cancelled because of:
(1) A major catastrophe or other event for which a state of
emergency or declaration of disaster is proclaimed pursuant to
NRS 414.070;
(2) An extraordinary event or circumstance that could not
have been foreseen by and is beyond the control of the ticket
provider; or
(3) Any other issue or event in the nature of force majeure;
or
(b) For an athletic contest or live entertainment event
scheduled to occur outdoors or within an open air venue,
including, without limitation, a music or cultural festival that
takes place over several days, the rights holder provides in the
terms and conditions of the live event ticket sold by the ticket
provider that the athletic contest or live entertainment event will
occur notwithstanding inclement weather conditions, other than
extreme or dangerous weather conditions and, because of such
extreme or dangerous weather conditions, the live entertainment
or athletic event, or a portion thereof, is cancelled.
Sec. 6. NRS 598.09223 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.09223 A person engages in a “deceptive trade practice”
when, in the course of his or her business or occupation, he or she
knowingly violates a provision of NRS 598.397 to 598.3984,
inclusive [.] , and sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 7. NRS 598.397 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.397 As used in NRS 598.397 to 598.3984, inclusive, and
sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 598.3971 to
598.3977, inclusive, and sections 2 and 3 of this act have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 8. NRS 598.3981 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.3981 1. The Bureau of Consumer Protection in the
Office of the Attorney General shall establish a toll-free statewide
hotline and an Internet website by which a person may file a
complaint relating to a suspected violation of NRS 598.397 to
598.3984, inclusive, and sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this act and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
obtain information and directions regarding the preferred method for
filing such a complaint.
2. Any form made available by the Bureau of Consumer
Protection for receiving complaints relating to a suspected violation
of NRS 598.397 to 598.3984, inclusive, and sections 2 to 5,
inclusive, of this act must be designed specifically for receiving
such complaints.
Sec. 9. NRS 598.3982 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.3982 1. A person injured by a violation of any provision
of NRS 598.397 to 598.3984, inclusive, other than sections 2 to 5,
inclusive, of this act, may bring a civil action against a reseller, a
secondary ticket exchange or any affiliate of a reseller or secondary
ticket exchange who committed the violation in a district court in
any county:
(a) In which the cause therefor accrued;
(b) In which the defendant resides or may be found;
(c) In which the plaintiff resides; or
(d) In which an athletic contest or live entertainment event to
which the ticket pertains occurred or will occur, if the violation
relates to the sale, purchase or advertisement of a ticket.
2. If the person bringing the action is the prevailing party, the
court shall award that person:
(a) Declaratory and injunctive relief.
(b) For the first violation, $1,000 or actual damages, whichever
is greater.
(c) For the second violation, $2,500, treble the amount of actual
damages and reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, if any.
(d) For the third and all subsequent violations, $5,000, treble the
amount of actual damages, reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, if
any, and punitive damages, which are subject to the provisions of
NRS 42.005.
3. An action may not be brought pursuant to this section
against a natural person employed by a reseller, a secondary ticket
exchange or any affiliate of a reseller or secondary ticket exchange.
Sec. 10. NRS 598.3983 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.3983 Unless a greater penalty is provided in NRS
598.0999 or 598.3984, a person who knowingly violates the
provisions of NRS 598.397 to 598.3984, inclusive, and sections 2 to
5, inclusive, of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 11. NRS 598.3984 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.3984 1. A person who willfully and knowingly violates
the provisions of NRS 598.397 to 598.3984, inclusive, and sections
2 to 5, inclusive, of this act relating to the sale of a ticket to an
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
entertainment facility which is operated by a governmental entity or
a public-private partnership is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Governmental entity” means:
(1) The government of this State;
(2) An agency of the government of this State;
(3) A political subdivision of this State; and
(4) An agency of a political subdivision of this State.
(b) “Public-private partnership” means a contract entered into by
a person and a governmental entity for the support of an
entertainment facility.
Sec. 12. NRS 598.39795 is hereby repealed.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)